Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.821

Exemption—Solicitation to host conference of a national association.

When soliciting gifts, grants, or donations to host an official conference within the state of Washington of a national association as approved by the state treasurer, the treasurer and designated employees are presumed not to be in violation of the solicitation and receipt of gift provisions in this chapter.

[ 2015 c 45 s 1.]